Hawaii statutes.
PART XII.
TRANSPORTATION OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS

Note

Part heading amended by L 1996, c 134, §1; am L 2000, c 86,
§1.

Cross References

Environmental response law, see chapter 128D.

Hazardous waste management, see chapter 342J.

§286-221 Definitions. As used in this
part, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Hazardous material" means a
substance or material which has been determined by the United States Secretary
of Transportation to be capable of posing an unreasonable risk to health, safety,
and property when transported in commerce, and which has been so designated.
The term includes hazardous substances, hazardous wastes, infectious
substances, medical wastes, marine pollutants, elevated temperature materials,
and materials that meet the defining criteria for hazard classes and divisions
in Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 173.

"Hazardous materials incident" means
an occurrence or likely occurrence or potential of a spill, release, leakage,
dumping, or loss of control of a hazardous material during the course of
transportation in commerce including loading, unloading, or temporary storage.

"Hazardous substance" means any
material, including its mixtures and solutions, defined under Title 49, Code of
Federal Regulations, Part 171.

"Hazardous waste" means any material
designated in Title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 261 and which are
subject to the hazardous waste manifest requirements of Title 40, Code of
Federal Regulations, Part 262.

"Infectious substance" means a viable
microorganism, or its toxin, which causes or may cause disease in humans and
animals, or which is further described as an infectious substance in Title 49,
Code of Federal Regulations, Part 173.

"Medical waste" means for
transportation purposes, shipments of medical waste material generated in the
diagnosis, treatment, or immunization of human beings and animals, in research
pertaining thereto, in the production or testing of biologicals, or which are
further described as regulated medical waste in Title 49, Code of Federal
Regulations, Part 173. [L 1989, c 185, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 134, §2; am L
2000, c 86, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next